District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-611.18

Housing bonus; District of Columbia employees.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1117
as added Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-203, § 2(e), 36 DCR 450
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-33, § 2, 38 DCR 4222

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-612.18.